Illinois, session 104th, SB3428.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1022 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1022)7    Sec. 5-1022. Competitive bids. 8    (a) Any purchase by a county with fewer than 2,000,000 9inhabitants, or an elected official in a county with fewer 10than 2,000,000 inhabitants, including an elected official with 11control of the internal operations of the office, of services, 12materials, equipment, or supplies in excess of $60,000 13$30,000, other than professional services, shall be contracted 14for in one of the following ways:15        (1) by a contract let to the lowest responsible bidder 16    after advertising for bids in a newspaper published within 17    the county or, if no newspaper is published within the 18    county, then a newspaper having general circulation within 19    the county;20        (2) by a contract let without advertising for bids in 21    the case of an emergency if authorized by the county 22    board; or23        (3) by a contract let without advertising for bids in   SB3428- 2 -LRB104 19402 RTM 32850 b1    the case of the expedited replacement of a disabled, 2    inoperable, or damaged patrol vehicle of the sheriff's 3    department if authorized by the county board. 4    (b) In determining the lowest responsible bidder, the 5county board shall take into consideration the qualities of 6the articles supplied; their conformity with the 7specifications; their suitability to the requirements of the 8county; the availability of support services; the uniqueness 9of the service, materials, equipment, or supplies as it 10applies to networked, integrated computer systems; the 11compatibility to existing equipment; and the delivery terms. 12In addition, the county board may take into consideration the 13bidder's active participation in an applicable apprenticeship 14program registered with the United States Department of Labor. 15The county board also may take into consideration whether a 16bidder is a private enterprise or a State-controlled 17enterprise and, notwithstanding any other provision of this 18Section or a lower bid by a State-controlled enterprise, may 19let a contract to the lowest responsible bidder that is a 20private enterprise.21    (c) This Section does not apply to contracts by a county 22with the federal government or to purchases of used equipment, 23purchases at auction or similar transactions which by their 24very nature are not suitable to competitive bids, pursuant to 25an ordinance adopted by the county board.26    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a   SB3428- 3 -LRB104 19402 RTM 32850 b1county may let without advertising for bids in the case of 2purchases and contracts, when individual orders do not exceed 3$35,000, for the use, purchase, delivery, movement, or 4installation of data processing equipment, software, or 5services and telecommunications and inter-connect equipment, 6software, and services.7    (e) A county may require, as a condition of any contract 8for goods and services, that persons awarded a contract with 9the county and all affiliates of the person collect and remit 10Illinois Use Tax on all sales of tangible personal property 11into the State of Illinois in accordance with the provisions 12of the Illinois Use Tax Act regardless of whether the person or 13affiliate is a "retailer maintaining a place of business 14within this State" as defined in Section 2 of the Use Tax Act. 15For purposes of this subsection (e), the term "affiliate" 16means any entity that (1) directly, indirectly, or 17constructively controls another entity, (2) is directly, 18indirectly, or constructively controlled by another entity, or 19(3) is subject to the control of a common entity. For purposes 20of this subsection (e), an entity controls another entity if 21it owns, directly or individually, more than 10% of the voting 22securities of that entity. As used in this subsection (e), the 23term "voting security" means a security that (1) confers upon 24the holder the right to vote for the election of members of the 25board of directors or similar governing body of the business 26or (2) is convertible into, or entitles the holder to receive   SB3428- 4 -LRB104 19402 RTM 32850 b1upon its exercise, a security that confers such a right to 2vote. A general partnership interest is a voting security.3    (f) Bids submitted to, and contracts executed by, the 4county may require a certification by the bidder or contractor 5that the bidder or contractor is not barred from bidding for or 6entering into a contract under this Section and that the 7bidder or contractor acknowledges that the county may declare 8the contract void if the certification completed pursuant to 9this subsection (f) is false.10(Source: P.A. 103-14, eff. 1-1-24; 103-286, eff. 7-28-23; 11103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)